Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-1,110.04
Offender under eighteen years
of age when offense committed; denied parole; considered for release every
year; Board of Parole; duties.

(1)
Any offender who was under the age of eighteen years when he or she committed
the offense for which he or she was convicted and incarcerated shall, if the
offender is denied parole, be considered for release on parole by the Board
of Parole every year after the denial.

(2) During each
hearing before the Board of Parole for the offender, the board shall consider
and review, at a minimum:

(a) The offender's educational and court documents;

(b) The offender's
participation in available rehabilitative and educational programs while incarcerated;

(c) The offender's
age at the time of the offense;

(d) The offender's level of maturity;

(e) The offender's
ability to appreciate the risks and consequences of his or her conduct;

(f) The offender's
intellectual capacity;

(g) The offender's level of participation in the offense;

(h) The offender's
efforts toward rehabilitation; and

(i) Any other mitigating factor or circumstance submitted
by the offender.

Laws 2013, LB44, § 3.